Hawaii statutes.
§454F-10.5 Authorized places of business;
designation of qualified individuals and branch managers; branch offices; principal
office; relocation. (a) Every mortgage loan originator company
licensed under this chapter shall have and maintain a principal place of
business in the State and shall designate a qualified individual to fulfill the
duties and responsibilities of a qualified individual set forth in section
454F-1.7.

(b) A mortgage loan originator company shall
not maintain any branch offices in the State in addition to its principal place
of business without the prior written approval of the commissioner. An
application to establish a branch office shall be submitted through NMLS with a nonrefundable application fee as
required by section 454F-22. A mortgage loan originator company shall
designate a branch manager for each branch office who
is physically present in the branch office to oversee that branch office
and fulfill the duties and responsibilities of a branch manager set forth in
section 454F-1.7. At no time shall a branch manager
oversee more than one branch office or principal place of business.

(c) A mortgage loan originator company shall
not relocate any office in this State without the prior written approval of the
commissioner. An application to relocate an office shall be submitted to the commissioner at least thirty days prior
to relocating and shall set forth the reasons for the relocation, the
street address of the proposed relocated office, and other information that may
be required by the commissioner. An application to relocate an office pursuant
to this subsection shall be submitted with a nonrefundable fee as required by
section 454F-22.

(d) A mortgage loan originator company shall
give the commissioner notice of its intent to close a branch office at least
thirty days prior to the closing. The notice shall:

(1) State the intended date of closing; and

(2) Specify the reasons for the closing.

(e) A mortgage loan originator company that
maintains its principal office outside of the State shall:

(1) Designate an office in this State as its
principal place of business in this State;

(2) Apply for and obtain approval from the
commissioner to designate its principal place of business in this State as a
branch office pursuant to this section; and

(3) Designate
a qualified individual; provided that the qualified individual may be the same
person designated as the branch manager of a branch office where the qualified
individual is physically present.

(f) A mortgage loan originator company that
maintains its principal office in this State shall designate a qualified
individual who is physically present in the principal place of business as its
branch manager to oversee and manage that principal place of business. Such principal
place of business shall not be considered a branch office for purposes of
section 454F-22(c).

(g) The principal place of business and each
branch office of the mortgage loan originator company shall be identified in
NMLS to consumers as a location at which the licensee holds itself out as a
mortgage loan originator company. Each such location shall be open for
business to the public during posted business hours which shall be during
regular business hours. If a location is in a commercial building, then the
business hours shall be posted on or adjacent to the main office door of the
mortgage loan originator company's location, and visible to the public from
outside the location. If a location is not in a commercial building, or such
posting is not permitted by the commercial building, then the business hours
shall be posted on the home page of the mortgage loan originator company's
website, along with the address and phone number of the location. Business
hours, whether posted at a location or on a mortgage loan originator company
website, shall be displayed in a clear, conspicuous, and accurate manner to
inform the consumer when the location will be open.

(h) The commissioner or the commissioner's
authorized representatives shall be able to conduct an examination or
investigation during regular business hours. If the commissioner or the
commissioner's authorized representatives are denied access to any office,
record, or file for any reason, such denial may be considered a violation of
this chapter. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3; am L 2011, c 194, §10; am L 2013, c 168,
§13; am L 2014, c 198, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next